sl-SI: Zasnova ročajev za sklice: Fiksno; Večravninsko; Paralete; Vrtljivo; Drugo
sk-SK: Konštrukcia podpier na kliky: Pevné; Viacrovinné; Bradielka; Rotačné; Iné
ro-RO: Designul barei de flotări: Fix; Multiplan; Paralele; Rotativ; Altele
fr: Type de barres de pompes: Fixe; Multi-plans; Parallettes; Rotatif; Autre
cs: Design přitahovací hrazdy: Pevný; Víceúrovňový; Parallettes; Rotační; Jiný
ko: 푸시업 바 디자인: 고정형; 다면형; 패럴렛; 회전형; 기타
it: design della barra per flessioni: Fisso; Multipiano; Parallelette; Rotante; Altro
fi: Punnerrustangon muotoilu: Kiinteä; Monitasoinen; Paralletit; Pyörivä; Muu
pt-PT: Design de barra de flexões: Fixa; Multiplano; Paralelas; Rotativa; Outro
zh-TW: 伏地挺身架設計: 固定式; 多平面式; 雙槓式; 旋轉式; 其他
hr-HR: Dizajn šipke za sklekove: Fiksno; Višeravninsko; Paralelete; Rotirajuće; Ostalo
hu: Fekvőtámaszrúd kialakítása: Rögzített; Több síkú; Parallette; Forgatható; Egyéb
lt-LT: Atsispaudimų atramos dizainas: Fiksuotas; Daugiaplano; Lygiagretės; Besisukantis; Kita
pt-BR: Barra de flexão design: Fixo; Multiplano; Paralelas; Giratório; Outro
th: การออกแบบบาร์สำหรับวิดพื้น: แบบคงที่; แบบหลายระนาบ; บาร์คู่ขนาน; แบบหมุนได้; อื่นๆ
ru: Конструкция упоров для отжиманий: Фиксированный; Многоплоскостной; Паралетсы; Вращающийся; Другое
ja: プッシュアップバーのデザイン: 固定式; マルチプレーン式; パラレット; 回転式; その他
nb: Armheving-stangdesign: Fast; Flerplans; Paralletter; Roterende; Annet
vi: Thiết kế thanh chống đẩy: Cố định; Đa mặt phẳng; Thanh xà kép mini; Xoay; Khác
el: Σχεδίαση μπαρών push-up: Σταθερό; Πολλαπλών επιπέδων; Parallettes; Περιστρεφόμενο; Άλλο
es: Diseño de las barras para flexiones: Fijo; Multiplano; Paralelas; Giratorio; Otro
en: Push-up bar design: Fixed; Multi-plane; Parallettes; Rotating; Other
bg-BG: Дизайн на стойката за лицеви опори: Фиксиран; Многоплоскостен; Успоредки; Въртящ се; Друго
da: Udformning af push-up-bars: Fast; Multi-plan; Parallettes; Roterende; Andet
zh-CN: 俯卧撑支架设计: 固定式; 多平面式; 双杠式; 旋转式; 其他
nl: Push-up stang ontwerp: Vast; Multi-plane; Parallettes; Draaiend; Overig
sv: Push-up-stångsdesign: Fast; Flerplans; Paralletter; Roterande; Övrigt
pl: Konstrukcja uchwytów do pompek: Stały; Wielopłaszczyznowy; Poręcze (paralletki); Obrotowy; Inne
de: Bauart der Liegestützgriffe: Fest; Multidimensional; Parallettes; Rotierend; Sonstige
tr: Şınav barı tasarımı: Sabit; Çok düzlemli; Parallet; Dönen; Diğer